Rhode Island statutes. Title 6 Commercial Law — General Regulatory Provisions
Chapter 26.1 Credit Card Lending

6-26.1-1.
Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

“ACH”, also known as the Automated Clearing House Network, means the electronic funds-transfer system comprised of a network of associated institutions that process computer-based electronic financial transactions between originating and receiving depository financial institutions. ACH in the United States is governed by NACHA, the former National Automated Clearing House Association.

“Credit card device” includes any means of making a credit card transaction available to a borrower pursuant to a credit card plan, including, but not limited to, a card, draft or check, identification code, other means of identification, or other credit device or code, whether made directly or indirectly by means of telephone, point of sale terminal, automated teller machine, computer or other electronic or other communication or device, or through the mail.

“Credit card lender” or “lender” means any entity that is a lending institution as defined by §

19-9-1

, or licensee as defined by §

19-14-1

, that offers or extends credit in the form of a credit card transaction.

“Credit card plan” or “plan” means any arrangement or plan between a borrower and a credit card lender or issuer, including, without limitation, lines of credit directly between a borrower and a credit card lender or issuer, for open-end, revolving extensions of credit made available through a credit card device or other means of settlement between the credit card lender or issuer and the merchant, such as ACH or electronic-only credit card devices, provided, however, said “credit card plan” or “plan” does not include an extension of credit the repayment of which is secured by real property.

“Credit card transaction” means any loan or extension of credit made pursuant to a credit card plan. Without limitation of the foregoing, a credit card transaction may be extended under a credit card plan by a credit card lender’s acquisition of obligations arising out of the honoring by a merchant or other third-party; a credit card lender or other financial institution (whether chartered or organized under the laws of this or any other state, the District of Columbia, the United States, or any district, territory, or possession of the United States, or any foreign country); or a government or governmental subdivision or agency of a credit card device.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 237, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 16; P.L. 2022, ch. 75, § 1, effective June 15, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 76, § 1, effective June 15, 2022.

6-26.1-2.
Authorization to make loans — Usury.

Any credit card lender may, subject to any limitations on lending authorities contained in its charter or otherwise imposed by law, offer and extend credit to a borrower and in connection with the credit may charge and collect interest, interest fees, and charges, and other charges permitted by this chapter and may take any security as collateral in connection with it that may be acceptable to the credit card lender.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 237, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 16.

6-26.1-3.
Variable rates.

If the agreement governing a credit card plan so provides, the periodic percentage rate or rates of interest under the plan may vary in accordance with a schedule or formula. The periodic rate or rates may vary from time to time as the rate determined in accordance with the schedule or formula varies and the periodic rate or rates, as so varied, may be made applicable to all or any part of outstanding, unpaid indebtedness under the plan on or after the first day of the billing cycle that contains the effective date of the variation, including any indebtedness arising out of purchases made or loans obtained prior to the variation in the periodic percentage rate or rates. Without limitation, a permissible schedule or formula pursuant to this section may include provisions in the agreement governing the plan for a change in the periodic percentage rate or rates of interest applicable to all or any part of outstanding unpaid indebtedness, whether by variation of the then-applicable periodic percentage rate or rates of interest; variation of an index or margin; or otherwise contingent upon the happening of any event or circumstance specified in the plan, which event or circumstance may include, but not be limited to, the failure of the borrower to perform in accordance with the terms of the plan.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 237, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 16.

6-26.1-4.
Interest.

A credit card lender may charge and collect interest under a credit card plan on outstanding unpaid indebtedness in the borrower’s account under the plan at any daily, weekly, monthly, annual, or other periodic percentage rate or rates that the agreement governing the plan provides or as established in the manner provided in the agreement governing the plan. If the agreement governing the plan so provides, the outstanding unpaid indebtedness may include the amount of any interest, interest fees and charges, and other charges outstanding. Interest may be calculated using an average daily balance; two-cycle, average daily balance; adjusted balance; previous balance method; or using any other balance computation method provided for in the agreement governing the plan. Credit card transactions may be included in the outstanding unpaid indebtedness as of any time as may be specified in the agreement governing the plan. Periodic billing cycles may be established in any manner and shall have the duration that may be specified in the agreement governing the plan.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 237, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 16.

6-26.1-5.
Interest fees and charges.

In addition to, or in lieu of, interest at a periodic percentage rate or rates as provided in §

6-26.1-4

, a credit card lender may, if the agreement governing the credit card plan so provides, charge and collect, as interest, in any manner or form that the plan may provide, one or more of the following:

Daily, weekly, monthly, annual, or other periodic charges in any amount or amounts that the agreement may provide for the privileges made available to the borrower under the plan;

A transaction charge or charges in any amount or amounts that the agreement may provide for each separate purchase, loan, or other transaction under the plan;

A minimum charge for each daily, weekly, monthly, annual or other scheduled billing period under the plan during any portion of which there is an outstanding unpaid indebtedness under the plan;

Reasonable fees for services rendered or for reimbursement of expenses incurred in good faith by the credit card lender or its agents in connection with the plan, or other reasonable fees incident to the application for and the opening, administration and termination of a plan including, without limitation, commitment, application and processing fees; official fees and taxes; costs incurred by reason of examination of title, inspection, appraisal, recording, mortgage satisfaction, or other formal acts necessary or appropriate to the security for the plan; and filing fees;

Returned payment charges or charges imposed for the return of a draft or check drawn on a credit card plan evidencing an extension of credit under the plan;

Documentary evidence charges;

Stop payment fees;

Overlimit charges;

Automated teller machine charges or other electronic or interchange fees or charges;

Prepayment charges authorized under subsection (b) of this section; and

Subject to any limitations contained in this chapter, any other fees and charges that are set forth in the agreement governing the plan.

An individual borrower may pay the outstanding unpaid indebtedness charged to the borrower’s account under a plan in full at any time. Except for a charge imposed to terminate a plan if the agreement governing the plan so provides, a credit card lender may not impose any prepayment charge in connection with the payment of outstanding unpaid indebtedness in full by an individual borrower. The terms of prepayment of the outstanding unpaid indebtedness relating to a credit card plan involving a borrower other than an individual borrower shall be as the lender and the borrower may agree.

No charges assessed in accordance with this section shall be deemed void as a penalty or otherwise unenforceable under any statute or the common law.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 237, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 16.

6-26.1-6.
Overdraft accounts.

If credit under a credit card plan is offered and extended in connection with a demand deposit account or other transaction account maintained by the borrower pursuant to an agreement or arrangement whereby the holder of the deposit account agrees to honor checks, drafts or other debits to the account, which if paid would create or increase a negative balance in the account, by making extensions of credit to the borrower under the credit card plan, any charges customarily imposed under the terms governing the demand deposit or other transaction account in the absence of any associated credit card plan (including, without limitation, check charges, monthly maintenance charges, checkbook charges, charges for checks drawn on funds in excess of an available line of credit and other similar charges) may continue to be imposed on the account without specific reference to it or incorporation of it by reference in the agreement governing the credit card plan and the amount of the charge, to the extent the balance in the demand deposit or other transaction account is insufficient to pay such a charge, may be charged to the borrower’s account under the plan as a loan under it and may be included in outstanding unpaid indebtedness in accordance with the terms of the agreement governing the credit card plan.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 237, § 1.

6-26.1-7.
Omitted installments.

A credit card lender may at any time and from time to time unilaterally extend to a borrower under a credit card plan the option of omitting monthly installments.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 237, § 1.

6-26.1-8.
Insurance.

A credit card lender may request but not require an individual borrower to be insured in respect of a credit card plan under a life, health, accident, health and accident or other credit or other permissible insurance policy or program, whether group or individual.

In the case of a borrower borrowing under a credit card plan for other than personal, household or family purposes, a credit card lender may require the borrower to obtain insurance, from an insurer acceptable to the credit card lender, under a life, health, accident, health and accident or other credit or other permissible insurance policy or program, whether group or individual.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 237, § 1.

6-26.1-9.
Delinquent installments.

If the agreement governing a credit card plan so provides, a credit card lender may impose, as interest, a late or delinquency charge upon any outstanding unpaid installment payments or portions of it under the plan that are in default; provided, however, that no more than one such late or delinquency charge may be imposed with respect to any single installment payment or portion of it, regardless of the period during which it remains in default; and provided further, however, that for the purpose only of the preceding provision all payments by the borrower shall be deemed to be applied to satisfaction of installment payments in the order in which they become due. Nothing contained in this section shall limit, restrict, or otherwise affect the right of a credit card lender to change the percentage rate or rates of interest applicable to the credit plan between the credit card lender and a borrower upon the occurrence of a delinquency or default or other failure of the borrower to perform in accordance with the terms of the plan.

No charges assessed by a credit card lender in accordance with this section shall be deemed void as a penalty or otherwise unenforceable under any statute or the common law.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 237, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 16.

6-26.1-10.
Attorneys’ fees — Costs.

In the event a borrower defaults under the terms of a plan, the credit card lender may, if the borrower’s account is referred to an attorney (not a regularly salaried employee of the credit card lender) or to a third party for collection and if the agreement governing the credit card plan so provides, charge and collect from the borrower a reasonable attorneys’ fee. In addition, following a borrower’s default, the credit card lender may, if the agreement governing the plan so provides, recover from the borrower all court, alternative dispute resolution or other collection costs (including, without limitation, fees and charges of collection agencies) actually incurred by the credit card lender.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 237, § 1.

6-26.1-11.
Amendment of agreement.

Unless the agreement governing a credit card plan otherwise provides, a credit card lender may at any time and from time to time amend the agreement in any respect, whether or not the amendment or the subject of the amendment was originally contemplated or addressed by the parties or is integral to the relationship between the parties. Without limiting the foregoing, the amendment may change terms by the addition of new terms or by the deletion or modification of existing terms, whether relating to plan benefits or features; the rate or rates of interest; the manner of calculating interest or outstanding unpaid indebtedness; variable schedules or formulas; interest fees and charges; fees; collateral requirements; methods for obtaining or repaying extensions of credit; attorneys’ fees; plan termination; the manner for amending the terms of the agreement; arbitration or other alternative dispute resolution mechanisms; or other matters of any kind whatsoever. Unless the agreement governing a credit card plan otherwise expressly provides, any amendment may, on and after the date upon which it becomes effective as to a particular borrower, apply to all then outstanding, unpaid indebtedness in the borrower’s account under the plan, including any indebtedness that arose prior to the effective date of the amendment. An agreement governing a credit card plan may be amended pursuant to this section regardless of whether the plan is active or inactive or whether additional borrowings are available under it. Any amendment that does not increase the rate or rates of interest charged by a credit card lender to a borrower under §§

6-26.1-3

or

6-26.1-4

may become effective as determined by the credit card lender, subject to compliance by the credit card lender with any applicable notice requirements under the Truth in Lending Act (15 U.S.C. § 1601 et seq.), and the regulations promulgated under it, as in effect from time to time. Any notice of an amendment sent by the credit card lender may be included in the same envelope with a periodic statement or as part of the periodic statement or in other materials sent to the borrower.

If an amendment increases the rate or rates of interest charged by a credit card lender to a borrower under §§

6-26.1-3

or

6-26.1-4

, the credit card lender shall mail or deliver to the borrower, at least fifteen (15) days before the effective date of the amendment, a clear and conspicuous written notice that shall describe the amendment and shall also set forth the effective date of it and any applicable information required to be disclosed pursuant to the following provisions of this section.

Any amendment that increases the rate or rates of interest charged by a credit card lender to a borrower under §§

6-26.1-3

or

6-26.1-4

may become effective as to a particular borrower if the borrower does not, within fifteen (15) days of the earlier mailing or delivery of the written notice of the amendment (or any longer period that may be established by the credit card lender), furnish written notice to the credit card lender that the borrower does not agree to accept the amendment. The notice from the credit card lender shall set forth the address to which a borrower may send notice of the borrower’s election not to accept the amendment and shall include a statement that, absent the furnishing of notice to the credit card lender of nonacceptance within the referenced fifteen day (15) time period, the amendment will become effective and apply to the borrower. As a condition to the effectiveness of any notice that a borrower does not accept the amendment, the credit card lender may require the borrower to return to it all credit devices. If, after fifteen (15) days from the mailing or delivery by the credit card lender of a notice of an amendment (or any longer period that may have been established by the credit card lender as referenced above), a borrower uses a plan by making a purchase or obtaining a loan, notwithstanding that the borrower has prior to the use furnished the credit card lender notice that the borrower does not accept an amendment, the amendment may be deemed by the credit card lender to have been accepted and may become effective as to the borrower as of the date that the amendment would have become effective but for the furnishing of notice by the borrower (or as of any later date selected by the credit card lender).

Any amendment that increases the rate or rates of interest charged by a credit card lender to a borrower under §§ 6-26.1-3 or 6-26.1-4 may, in lieu of the procedure referenced in subdivision (2) of this subsection, become effective as to a particular borrower if the borrower uses the plan after a date specified in the written notice of the amendment that is at least fifteen (15) days after the mailing or delivery of the notice (but that need not be the date the amendment becomes effective) by making a purchase or obtaining a loan; provided that the notice from the credit card lender includes a statement that the described usage after the references date will constitute the borrower’s acceptance of the amendment.

Any borrower who furnishes timely notice electing not to accept an amendment in accordance with the procedures referenced in subdivision (2) of this subsection and who does not subsequently use the plan, or who fails to use the borrower’s plan as referenced in subdivision (3) of this subsection, shall be permitted to pay the outstanding unpaid indebtedness in the borrower’s account under the plan in accordance with the rate or rates of interest charged by a credit card lender to a borrower under §§ 6-26.1-3 or 6-26.1-4 without giving effect to the amendment; provided, however, that the credit card lender may convert the borrower’s account to a closed-end credit account on credit terms substantially similar to those set forth in the then-existing agreement governing the borrower’s plan.

Notwithstanding the other provisions of this section, no notice required by this section of an amendment of an agreement governing a credit card plan shall be required, and any amendment may become effective as of any date agreed upon between a credit card lender and a borrower, with respect to any amendment that is agreed upon between the credit card lender and the borrower, either orally or in writing.

For purposes of this section, the following are examples of amendments that shall not be deemed to increase the rate or rates of interest charged by a credit card lender to a borrower under §§

6-26.1-3

or

6-26.1-4

:

A decrease or increase in the required number or amount of periodic installment payments;

Any change to a plan that increases the rate or rates in effect immediately prior to the change by less than one-quarter of one percentage point (0.25%) per annum; provided that a credit card lender may not make more than one such change in reliance on this subdivision with respect to a plan within any twelve-month (12) period;

A change in the schedule or formula used under a variable-rate plan under §

6-26.1-3

that varies the determination date of the applicable rate; the time period for which the applicable rate will apply; or the effective date of any variation of the rate or any other similar change; or

Any other change in the schedule or formula used under a variable-rate plan under § 6-26.1-3; provided that the initial interest rate that would result from any change under this subdivision (3), as determined on the effective date of the change or, if the notice of the change is mailed or delivered to the borrower prior to the effective date, as of any date within sixty (60) days before mailing or delivery of the notice, will not be an increase from the rate in effect on the date under the existing schedule or formula.

A change from a variable-rate plan to a fixed rate, or from a fixed-rate to a variable-rate plan so long as the initial rate that would result from such a change, as determined on the effective date of the change, or if the notice of the change is mailed or delivered to the borrower prior to the effective date, as of any date within sixty (60) days before mailing or delivery of the notice, will not be an increase from the rate in effect on the date under the existing plan;

A change from a daily periodic rate to a periodic rate other than daily or from a periodic rate other than daily to a daily periodic rate; and

A change in the method of determining the outstanding unpaid indebtedness upon which interest is calculated (including, without limitation, a change with respect to the date by which, or the time period within which, a new balance or any portion of it must be paid to avoid additional interest).

The procedures for amendment by a credit card lender of the terms of a plan to which a borrower, other than an individual borrower, is a party may, in lieu of the foregoing provisions of this section, be as the agreement governing the plan may otherwise provide.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 237, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 16.

6-26.1-12.
Materiality of terms.

All terms, conditions and other provisions of and relating to a credit card plan as contained in this chapter or any other applicable chapter, or in the agreement governing the plan (other than those which are interest under this chapter,) including, without limitation, provisions relating to the method of determining the outstanding unpaid indebtedness on which interest is applied; time periods within which interest or interest fees and charges may be avoided; reasons for default and the right to cure any default; right to accelerate; account cancellation; choice of law; change in terms requirements; right to charge and collect attorneys’ fees; court and collection costs; and the compounding of interest or interest fees and charges, shall be, and hereby are deemed to be, material to the determination of interest applicable to a plan under Rhode Island law, under the most favored lender doctrine, and under the National Credit Card Lender Act (12 U.S.C. § 85) or Section 521 of the Depository Institutions Deregulation and Monetary Control Act of 1980 (12 U.S.C. § 1831(d)).

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 237, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 16.

6-26.1-13.
Applicable law.

An agreement governing a credit card plan shall be governed by the laws of the state of Rhode Island, and any other law of this state limiting the rate or amount of interest, discounts, points, finance charges, service charges or other charges or fees shall not apply to extensions of credit under a credit card plan operated in accordance with this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 237, § 1.